Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 45. Life Insurance and Annuities.

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, §§ 553, 534, 1448 to 1450.

45 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 1086-1110, 1419-1426.

Sec. 21.45.010.
Applicability.

This chapter applies only to contracts of life insurance and annuities, other than reinsurance, group life insurance, and group annuities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.020.
Standards provisions required; return and refund.

A policy of life insurance, other than group and pure endowments with or without return of premiums or of premiums and interest, may not be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless it contains in substance all of the applicable provisions required by AS

21.45.030

—

21.45.150

. This section does not apply to annuity contracts or to a provision of a life insurance policy, or contract supplemental to it, relating to health insurance benefits or to additional benefits in the event of death by accident or accidental means.

The provisions or portions of provisions not applicable to single premium or term policies may not to that extent be incorporated in the policy.

A life insurance policy or annuity contract delivered or issued for delivery in this state and each life insurance policy or annuity contract application must contain a notice prominently printed on or attached to the first page stating

on written request, an insurer is required to provide, within a reasonable time, reasonable factual information regarding the benefits and provisions of the policy or contract to the policy or contract holder; and

if, for any reason, the policy or contract holder is not satisfied with the policy or contract, the policy or contract holder may return the policy or contract within 10 days after the policy or contract is delivered and, except as provided in (d) of this section, receive a refund of all money paid.

For a variable life insurance policy or variable annuity contract, the refund under (c) of this section must equal the sum of

the difference between the premiums paid, including any policy or contract fees or other charges and the amounts allocated to any separate accounts under the policy or contract; and

the value of amounts allocated to any separate accounts on the date the returned policy is received by the insurer or its insurance producer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 55 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 61 ch 23 SLA 2011; am § 40 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (d)(1), inserted “and the amounts allocated to any separate accounts under the policy or contract” following “other charges”, in (d)(2), inserted “value of” preceding “amounts”, deleted “under the policy or contract” preceding “on the date”.

Sec. 21.45.030.
Grace period.

There shall be a provision that a grace period of 30 days, or, at the option of the insurer, of one month of not less than 30 days, or of four weeks in the case of industrial life insurance policies the premiums for which are payable more frequently than monthly, is allowed within which the payment of each premium after the first premium may be made, during which period of grace the policy shall continue in full force.
If a claim arises under the policy during the period of grace the amount of the premium due or overdue may be deducted from the policy proceeds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.040.
Incontestability.

There shall be a provision that the policy, exclusive of provisions relating to health insurance benefits or to additional benefits in the event of death by accident or accidental means and except for nonpayment of premiums, is uncontestable after it has been in force during the lifetime of the insured for a period of two years from its date of issue.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 56 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, § 761 et seq.

45 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 850-859.

Sec. 21.45.050.
Entire contract.

There shall be a provision that the policy, or the policy and the policy application if a copy of the application is endorsed upon or attached to the policy when issued, constitute the entire contract between the parties, and if the application is made a part of the policy, that all statements contained in the application shall, in the absence of fraud, be considered representations and not warranties.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.060.
Misstatement of age.

Except as provided in AS

21.45.210

, there shall be a provision that if the age of the insured or of another person whose age is considered in determining the premium or benefit has been misstated, any amount payable or benefit accruing under the policy shall be such as the premium would have purchased at the correct age or ages.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.070.
Dividends.

Except as provided in AS

21.45.220

, there shall be a provision in participating policies that, beginning not later than the end of the third policy year, the insurer shall annually ascertain and apportion the divisible surplus, if any, that will accrue on the policy anniversary or other dividend date specified in the policy if the policy is in force and all premiums to that date are paid. Except as hereinafter provided, any dividend becoming payable shall, at the option of the party entitled to elect the option, be either

payable in cash; or

applied to one of the other dividend options that may be provided by the policy; if any other dividend option is provided, the policy must further state which options shall be automatically effective when the party does not elect another option; if the policy specifies a period within which the other dividend option may be elected, the period may not be less than 30 days following the date on which the dividend is due and payable; the annually apportioned dividend shall be payable in cash even though the policy provides that payment of the dividend is to be deferred for a specified period if the period does not exceed six years from the date of apportionment and that interest will be added to the dividend at a specified rate; if a participating policy provides that the benefit under a paid-up nonforfeiture provision is to be participating, it may provide that any divisible surplus becoming payable or apportioned while the insurance is in force under the nonforfeiture provision shall be applied in the manner set out in the policy.

In participating industrial life insurance policies, in lieu of the provision required in (a) of this section, there shall be a provision that, beginning not later than the end of the fifth policy year, the policy shall participate annually in the divisible surplus, if any, in the manner set out in the policy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.080.
Policy loan.

There shall be a provision that after three full years’ premiums have been paid and after the policy has a cash surrender value and while no premium is in default beyond the grace period for payment, the insurer will advance, on proper assignment or pledge of the policy and on the sole security of the policy, at a specified rate of interest not exceeding eight percent a year, an amount equal to or, at the option of the party entitled to it, less than the loan value of the policy. The director may authorize rates of interest in excess of six percent only on a finding that the holders of policies will benefit from the increased earnings of the insurer resulting from the higher rates, through the use of higher dividends or lower premiums, or both. The loan value of the policy shall be at least equal to the cash surrender value at the end of the then current policy year, except that the insurer may deduct, either from the loan value or from the proceeds of the loan, an existing indebtedness not already deducted in determining the cash surrender value including interest then accrued but not due, the unpaid balance of the premium for the current policy year, and interest on the loan to the end of the current policy year. The policy may also provide that if interest on an indebtedness is not paid when due it shall then be added to the existing indebtedness and shall bear interest at the same rate, and that if and when the total indebtedness on the policy, including interest due or accrued, equals or exceeds the amount of the loan value of the policy, the policy shall terminate and become void. The policy must reserve to the insurer the right to defer the granting of a loan, other than for the payment of a premium to the insurer, for six months after the date of the loan application. The policy, at the insurer’s option, may provide for automatic premium loan, subject to an election of the party entitled to elect. Except as provided in (e) of this section, the required interest rates on policy loans set out in this section apply only to policies issued before July 1, 1982.

This section does not apply to term policies or to term insurance benefits provided by rider or supplemental policy provisions, or to industrial life insurance policies.

A policy issued on or after July 1, 1982, must have a provision specifying an interest rate on a policy loan not to exceed eight percent a year, or a provision permitting an adjustable maximum interest rate established under this subsection. An adjustable maximum rate of interest on a policy loan determined under this subsection may not exceed the higher of the published monthly average for the calendar month ending two months before the date on which the rate is determined, or the rate used to compute cash surrender values under the policy during the applicable period plus one-twelfth of a percentage point multiplied by the number of months in the applicable period. If an adjustable maximum rate of interest is used in a policy under this subsection, the policy must contain a provision that states times for the adjustment of the interest rate for that policy. Adjustment shall occur at least once every 12 months, but not more often than once every three months. The interest rate being charged may be increased if the published monthly average increases by one-half percent or more and the interest rate being charged must be reduced if the published monthly average decreases by one-half percent or more. A life insurer shall (1) notify the policyholder of the initial rate of interest on the loan at the time a cash loan is made; (2) notify a policyholder who obtains a premium loan of the initial rate of interest on the loan as soon as it is reasonably possible to do so after making an initial premium loan; except as provided in (3) of this subsection, notice does not have to be given to the policyholder when a second or subsequent premium loan is added; (3) send reasonable advance notice of any increase in the rate to a policyholder who has a policy loan; and (4) include other relevant information on adjustment of interest rates in a notice required under this subsection. The loan value of the policy shall be determined in accordance with (a) of this section. A policy may not be terminated in a policy year as the sole result of a change in the interest rate during that policy year. If an interest rate changes, the insurer shall maintain coverage during the policy year until the date on which the policy would have terminated if the interest rate had not changed.

In (c) of this section

“interest rate” includes a rate of interest charged for reinstatement of policy loans for the period during and after the lapse of a policy;

“policy” includes certificates issued by a fraternal benefit society and annuity contracts that provide for policy loans;

“policy loan” includes a premium loan made under a policy to pay a premium that was not paid to the life insurer as it became due;

“policyholder” includes an owner of a policy or a person designated to pay policy premiums according to the records of the life insurer;

“published monthly average” means the monthly average of corporate bond yields as published by Moody’s Investor Service, Inc., or its successor, or if Moody’s corporate bond yield average-monthly average corporates is not published, a substantially similar average, established by regulation adopted by the director.

The provisions of (c) of this section on interest rates apply only to policy loans made on policies issued on or after July 1, 1982, except that if a policyholder agrees in writing to the applicability of (c) of this section to a policy issued before July 1, 1982, that subsection applies to policy loans made on that policy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 103 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 2 ch 121 SLA 1982; am § 16 ch 21 SLA 1985)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 8, ch. 103, SLA 1980, provides: “This Act shall not impair the terms and conditions of any policy of life insurance issued before September 18, 1980.”

Sec. 21.45.090.
Table of values.

There shall be a table showing in figures the loan value, if required under AS

21.45.080

, and the cash surrender values and nonforfeiture benefits in accordance with AS

21.45.300(b)(5)

, either during the first 20 policy years or during the term of the policy, whichever is shorter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.100.
Table of installments.

In case the policy provides that the proceeds may be payable in installments which are determinable at issue of the policy, there shall be a table showing the amounts of the guaranteed installments.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.110.
Reinstatement.

Except as provided in AS

21.45.230

, there shall be a provision that unless (1) the policy has been surrendered for its cash surrender value, (2) its cash surrender value has been exhausted, or (3) the paid-up term insurance, if any, has expired, the policy will be reinstated at any time within three years, or two years in the case of industrial life insurance policies, from the date of premium default upon written application, the production of evidence of insurability satisfactory to the insurer, the payment of all premiums in arrears with interest at a rate not exceeding six percent a year compounded annually, and the payment or reinstatement of interest due to the insurer on a loan on the policy with interest as provided in AS

21.45.080(c)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 121 SLA 1982)

Sec. 21.45.120.
Payment of premiums.

There shall be a provision relative to the payment of premiums.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.130.
Payment of claims.

There shall be a provision that when a policy becomes a claim by the death of the insured, settlement shall be made upon receipt of due proof of death and, at the insurer’s option, surrender of the policy, proof of the interest of the claimant, or both.
If an insurer specifies a particular period before the expiration of which settlement shall be made, the period may not exceed two months from the receipt of the proofs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.140.
Beneficiary, industrial policies.

An industrial life insurance policy must have the name of the beneficiary designated on it with a reservation of the right to designate or change the beneficiary after the issuance of the policy.
The policy may also provide that no designation or change of beneficiary shall be binding on the insurer until endorsed on the policy by the insurer, and that the insurer may refuse to endorse the name of proposed beneficiary who does not appear to the insurer to have an insurable interest in the life of the insured.
The policy may also provide that if the beneficiary designated in the policy does not make a claim under the policy or does not surrender the policy with due proof of death within the period stated in the policy, which may not be less than 30 days after the death of the insured, or if the beneficiary is the estate of the insured, or is a minor, or dies before the insured, or is not legally competent to give a valid release, the insurer may pay the proceeds to the executor or administrator of the insured, or to any relative of the insured by blood or legal adoption or connection by marriage, or to any person appearing to the insurer to be equitably entitled to the proceeds by reason of having been named beneficiary, or by reason of having incurred expense for the maintenance, medical attention, or burial of the insured.
The policy may also include a similar provision applicable to other payments due under the policy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.150.
Title.

There shall be a title on the policy, briefly describing it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.160.
Excluded or restricted coverage.

A clause in a policy of life insurance stating that the policy shall be incontestable after a specified period precludes only a contest of the validity of the policy and does not preclude the assertion at any time of defenses based upon provisions in the policy that exclude or restrict coverage, whether or not the restrictions or exclusions are excepted in such clause.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.170.
Standard provisions: annuity and pure endowment contracts.

An annuity or pure endowment contract, other than a reversionary annuity, survivorship annuity, or group annuity, may not be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless it contains in substance each of the provisions specified in AS

21.45.180

—

21.45.230

, except that if a provision is not applicable to single premium annuities or single premium pure endowment contracts it may not be incorporated into the contract.

This section does not apply to contracts for deferred annuities included in or upon the lives of beneficiaries under, life insurance policies.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.180.
Grace period: annuities.

In an annuity or pure endowment contract, other than a reversionary, survivorship, or group annuity, there shall be a provision for a grace period of one month, but not less than 30 days, within which a stipulated payment other than the first one may be made, subject at the option of the insurer to make an interest charge on the late payment at a rate to be specified in the contract, but not exceeding six percent a year, for the number of days of grace elapsing before the payment, during which period of grace the contract shall continue in full force, but in case a claim arises under the contract on account of death before expiration of the period of grace before the overdue payment to the insurer or the deferred payments of the current contract year, if any, are made, the amount of the payments, with interest on any overdue payments, may be deducted from the amount payable under the contract in settlement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.190.
Incontestability: annuities.

Except as provided in AS

21.45.210

, if any statements, other than those relating to age, sex, and identity are required as a condition to issuing an annuity or pure endowment contract, other than a reversionary, survivorship, or group annuity, there shall be a provision that the contract is incontestable after it has been in force during the lifetime of the person or of each of the persons as to whom the statements are required, for a period of two years from its date of issue, except for nonpayment of stipulated payments to the insurer; and at the option of the insurer the contract may also except provisions relative to benefits in the event of disability and provisions that grant insurance specifically against death by accident or accidental means.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.200.
Entire contract.

In an annuity or pure endowment contract, other than a reversionary, survivorship, or group annuity, there shall be a provision that the contract constitutes the entire contract between the parties or, if a copy of the application is endorsed upon or attached to the contract when issued, there shall be a provision that the contract and the application constitute the entire contract between the parties.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.210.
Misstatement of age or sex: annuities.

In an annuity or pure endowment contract, other than a reversionary, survivorship, or group annuity, there shall be a provision that if the age or sex of the person or persons upon whose life or lives the contract is made, or of any of them, has been misstated, the amount payable or benefits accruing under the contract shall be such as the stipulated payment or payments to the insurer would have purchased according to the correct age or sex and that if the insurer makes or has made an overpayment or overpayments on account of a misstatement, the amount of the overpayment, with interest at the rate to be specified in the contract but not exceeding six percent a year, may be charged against the current or next succeeding payment or payments to be made by the insurer under the contract.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.220.
Dividends: annuities.

If an annuity or pure endowment contract, other than a reversionary, survivorship, or group annuity, is participating, there shall be a provision that the insurer shall annually ascertain and apportion any divisible surplus accruing on the contract.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.230.
Reinstatement: annuities.

In an annuity or pure endowment contract, other than a reversionary, survivorship, or group annuity, there shall be a provision that the contract may be reinstated at any time within one year from the default in making stipulated payments to the insurer, unless the cash surrender value had been paid, if all overdue stipulated payments and any indebtedness to the insurer on the contract are paid or reinstated with interest at a rate to be specified in the contract, not exceeding six percent a year payable annually. Where applicable the insurer may also include a requirement of evidence of insurability satisfactory to the insurer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.240.
Standard provisions: reversionary annuities.

Except as stated herein, a contract for a reversionary annuity may not be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless it contains in substance each of the following provisions:

those provisions specified in AS

21.45.180

—

21.45.220

, except that under AS

21.45.180

the insurer may at its option provide for an equitable reduction of the amount of the annuity payments in settlement of an overdue payment in lieu of providing for deduction of the payments from an amount payable upon settlement under the contract;

a provision that the contract may be reinstated at any time within three years from the date of default in making stipulated payments to the insurer, upon production of evidence of insurability satisfactory to the insurer, and upon condition that all overdue payments and any indebtedness to the insurer on account of the contract be paid, or, within the limits permitted by the then cash values of the contract, reinstated, with interest as to both payments and indebtedness at a rate to be specified in the contract but not exceeding six percent a year compounded annually.

This section does not apply to group annuities or to annuities included in life insurance policies, and any of the provisions not applicable to single premium annuities shall not to that extent be incorporated into the policy or contract.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.250.
Limitation of liability.

A policy of life insurance may not be delivered or issued for delivery in this state if it contains a provision

for a period shorter than that provided by statute within which an action at law or in equity may be commenced on the policy; or

that excludes or restricts liability for death caused in a certain specified manner or occurring while the insured has a specified status, except that a policy may contain provisions excluding or restricting coverage as specified therein in the event of death

as a result, directly or indirectly, of war, declared or undeclared, or of action by military forces, or of any act or hazard of the war or action, or of service in the military, naval, or air forces or in civilian forces auxiliary thereto, or from any cause while a member of the military, naval, or air forces of any country at war, declared or undeclared, or of any country engaged in military action;

as a result of aviation or any air travel or flight;

as a result of a specified hazardous occupation or occupations;

while the insured is a resident outside the United States and Canada; or

within two years from the date of issue of the policy as a result of suicide, while sane or insane.

A policy that contains an exclusion or restriction under (a) of this section must also provide that in the event of death under the circumstances to which an exclusion or restriction is applicable, the insurer will pay an amount not less than a reserve determined according to the commissioner’s Reserve Valuation Method upon the basis of the mortality table and interest rate specified in the policy for the calculation of nonforfeiture benefits (or if the policy provides for no such benefits, computed according to a mortality table and interest rate determined by the insurer and either specified in the policy or filed with the director) with adjustment for indebtedness or dividend credit.

This section does not apply to industrial life insurance, group life insurance, health insurance, reinsurance, or annuities, or to a provision in a life insurance policy relating to health benefits or to additional benefits in the event of death by accident or accidental means.

Nothing contained in this section prohibits a provision that in the opinion of the director is more favorable to the policyholder than a provision permitted by this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 57 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Sec. 21.45.260.
Prohibited provisions: industrial life insurance.

A policy of industrial life insurance may not contain a provision

by which the insurer may deny liability under the policy for the reason that the insured has previously obtained other insurance from the same insurer;

giving the insurer the right to declare the policy void on the grounds that the insured has had a disease or ailment, whether specified or not, or that the insured has received institutional, hospital, medical, or surgical treatment or attention, except the policy may contain a provision that gives the insurer the right to declare the policy void if the insured has, within two years before the issuance of the policy, received institutional, hospital, medical, or surgical treatment or attention and the insured or claimant under the policy fails to show that the condition occasioning the treatment or attention was not of a serious nature or was not material to the risk;

giving the insurer the right to declare the policy void because the insured has been rejected for insurance by another insurer, unless the right is conditioned upon a showing by the insurer that knowledge of the rejection would have led to a refusal by the insurer to make the contract.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.270.
Incontestability, limitation of liability after reinstatement.

A reinstated policy of life insurance or annuity contract may be contested on account of fraud or misrepresentation of facts material to the reinstatement only for the same period following reinstatement and with the same conditions and exceptions as the policy provides with respect to contestability after original issuance.

When a life insurance policy or annuity contract is reinstated, the reinstated policy or contract may exclude or restrict liability to the same extent that the liability might have been or was excluded or restricted when the policy or contract was originally issued, and the exclusion or restriction shall be effective from the date of reinstatement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.280.
Policy settlements.

A life insurer shall have the power to hold under agreement the proceeds of any policy issued by it, upon the terms and restrictions as to revocation by the policyholder and control by beneficiaries, and with the exemptions from the claims of creditors of beneficiaries other than the policyholder as set out in the policy or as agreed to in writing by the insurer and the policyholder.
Upon maturity of a policy, in the event the policyholder has made no such agreement, the insurer shall have the power to hold the proceeds of the policy under an agreement with the beneficiaries.
The insurer shall not be required to segregate the funds so held but may hold them as part of its general assets.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.45.290.
Indebtedness deducted from proceeds.

In determining the amount due under a life insurance policy, whether issued before or after July 1, 1966, deduction may be made of

unpaid premiums or installments for the current policy year due under the terms of the policy; and of

the amount of principal and accrued interest of a policy loan or other indebtedness against the policy then remaining unpaid.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)